Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 7. Economic Employment Improvement Program for Disadvantaged Persons.

§§ 63.2-700 through 63.2-702.

Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 428.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-700

, which established the Economic and Employment Improvement Program, derived from 2000, cc. 483, 491, § 63.1-133.56; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 747. Former § 63.2-701, which provided for administration of the Economic and Employment Improvement Program by the Department, derived from 2000, cc. 483, 491, § 63.1-133.57; 2002, c. 747. Former § 63.2-702, which reestablished the Grant Awards Committee, derived from 2000, cc. 483, 491, § 63.1-133.58; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 747.

Repealed § 63.2-702 was amended by Acts 2003, c. 467.